Hawaii statutes.
§182-10 Revocation of mining leases. A
mining lease may be revoked if the lessee fails to pay rentals when due or if
any of the terms of the lease or of law are not complied with, or if the lessee
wholly ceases all mining operations for other than reasons of force majeure or
the uneconomic operation of the mining lease for a period of one year without the
written consent of the board; provided that the board shall give the lessee
notice of any default and the lessee shall have six months or such other time
limit as provided by the rules from the date of the notice to remedy the
default. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-10; HRS §182-10; am L 1978, c 135,
§7; am L 2016, c 220, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next